Utah statutes.
62A-3-104.3.   Disbursal of public funds -- Background check of a personal care attendant.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "office" is as defined in Section 62A-2-101.

(2)  Subject to Subsection (4), public funds may not be disbursed to a personal care attendant as payment for personal services rendered to an aged person or high risk adult, unless the personal care attendant is approved by the office to have direct access and provide services to children or vulnerable adults pursuant to Section 62A-2-120.

(3)  For purposes of Subsection (2), the office shall conduct a background check of a personal care attendant:

(a)  who desires to receive public funds as payment for the personal services described in Subsection (2); and

(b)  using the same procedures established for a background check of an applicant for an initial license under Section 62A-2-120.

(4)  The background check and the approval determination described in this section shall be conducted for a personal care attendant on an annual basis.



Enacted by Chapter 107, 2005 General Session

